dev/apertium-urd.urd.dix
    <pardef n="چھ/یننا__vblex_caus2">
      <e><p>          <l>نوانا</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نوانے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواؤں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نوائیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواؤں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نوائیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواؤ</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواؤ</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواؤ</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواؤ</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نوا</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواؤ</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نوا</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواؤ</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواؤ</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نوائیے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نوائیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نوائیے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نوائیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواؤ</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نوائیے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نوائیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نوائیے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نوائیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نوائے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نوائیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نوائے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نوائیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نوائے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نوائیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نوائے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نوائیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواتا</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواتے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواتی</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواتیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواتے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواتے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواتی</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواتیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواتیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواتا</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواتے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواتی</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواتیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواتے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواتے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواتی</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواتیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواتیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواتا</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواتے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواتی</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواتیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواتا</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواتے</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواتی</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نواتیں</l><r>یننا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus2"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    <e lm="چھیننا"><i>چھ</i><par n="چھ/یننا__vblex_caus2"/></e>
